Nebraska, session 109, LB720.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 38-1001, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
38-1001 Sections 38-1001 to 38-10,172 and section 2 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail
Technology, and Body Art Practice Act.
Sec. 2. (1) The department shall create and issue a temporary,
nonrenewable event license for an individual who is attending a body art event
which shall allow the individual to practice for no more than seven consecutive
days in any twelve-month period. No more than two temporary event licenses
shall be issued to the same individual in any twelve-month period. An
individual holding an event license under this section shall practice within a
licensed body art facility that has been inspected pursuant to subsection (5)
of this section.
(2) An individual applying for an event license described in subsection
(1) of this section shall hold a valid, unrestricted license or permit showing
the individual is active in another state and shall submit the following
documents to the department:
(a) A completed application form;
(b) A copy of a government-issued photographic identification showing the
individual's proof of age;
(c) A copy of the individual's body art license; and
(d) A sponsorship letter from the owner or operator of a licensed body art
facility at which the individual will practice under the event license.
(3) The event license shall include the (a) individual's name, (b)
approved location or event, (c) expiration date, (d) state of issuance, and (e)
number of the individual's license or permit.
(4) The department shall charge a fifty-dollar fee for issuance of the
event license. The department shall remit the fee to the State Treasurer for
credit to the Professional and Occupational Credentialing Cash Fund.
(5) The department may conduct an in-person inspection of the body art
facility where body art practice will occur for a body art event to assess
compliance with the department's rules and regulations. Such inspection may be
conducted by a health specialist with body art training, including, but not
limited to, a registered environmental health specialist.
(6) A violation of this section is subject to the same penalties as an
individual or a facility holding a permanent license to practice body art under
the Uniform Credentialing Act.
Sec. 3. Original section 38-1001, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-